Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB104.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6102(a) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 6102. Definitions.(a) General rule.--The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Electronic monitoring device." A device that enables the location of a person wearing the device to be monitored through use of a global positioning system and related technology and is designed so that the device:(1) Actively and continuously monitors, identifies and reports location data within a 100-mile radius.123456789101112131415161718 (2) Permits the Pennsylvania State Police and any local police department to receive, record and securely and confidentially retain location data indefinitely.(3) May be worn around a person's wrist or ankle.(4) Once fitted around a person's wrist or ankle, cannot be removed without using specialized equipment specifically designed for that purpose and alerting the Pennsylvania State Police and each local police department that the device has been removed.* * *Section 2. Section 6108(a) of Title 23 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 6108. Relief.(a) General rule.--Subject to subsection (a.1), the court may grant any protection order or approve any consent agreement to bring about a cessation of abuse of the plaintiff or minor children. The order or agreement may include:* * *(6.1) Requiring an electronic monitoring device be placed on the defendant if the defendant is found to present a substantial risk of violating the final protection from abuse order or committing a crime against the victim punishable by imprisonment. The following shall apply:(i) The electronic monitoring device shall monitor the defendant's location relative to all persons for whom protection is sought. The court shall determine the distance at which the defendant is to remain from all persons seeking protection from abuse and specific locations from which the defendant shall refrain.(ii) Except as provided under subparagraph (iii), 20250HB0104PN0083 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the court shall order the defendant to wear the electronic monitoring device for the entire period of time that the final protection from abuse order is in effect.(iii) The court may only order the electronic monitoring device be removed from the defendant before the expiration of the final protection from abuse order for good cause shown. If the court orders the device removed, the court shall notify the plaintiff covered by the final protection from abuse order that the electronic monitoring device has been removed.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0104PN0083 - 3 - 12345678910111213